Hawaii statutes.
§842-4 Prohibited affirmative defense.
The affirmative defense of being a player in a social gambling game is not
available to a person engaged in organized crime or who is connected directly
or indirectly with persons who are engaged in organized crime. [L 1972, c 71,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next